Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/et_affix.dat
SFX L   0                    tesse                õos
SFX L   0                    tes                  õos
SFX L   0                    test                 õos
SFX L   0                    tele                 õos
SFX L   0                    tel                  õos
SFX L   0                    telt                 õos
SFX L   0                    teks                 õos
SFX L   0                    teni                 õos
SFX L   0                    tena                 õos
SFX L   0                    teta                 õos
SFX L   0                    tega                 õos
SFX L   s                    ksed                 õos
SFX L   s                    kseid                õos
SFX L   s                    kseisse              õos
SFX L   s                    kseis                õos
SFX L   s                    kseist               õos
SFX L   s                    kseile               õos
SFX L   s                    kseil                õos
SFX L   s                    kseilt               õos
SFX L   s                    kseiks               õos
SFX L   s                    kseini               õos
SFX L   s                    kseina               õos
SFX L   s                    kseita               õos
SFX L   s                    kseiga               õos
SFX L   0                    t                    mas
SFX L   0                    te                   mas
SFX L   0                    tesse                mas
SFX L   0                    tes                  mas
SFX L   0                    test                 mas
SFX L   0                    tele                 mas
SFX L   0                    tel                  mas
SFX L   0                    telt                 mas
SFX L   0                    teks                 mas
SFX L   0                    teni                 mas
SFX L   0                    tena                 mas
SFX L   0                    teta                 mas
SFX L   0                    tega                 mas
SFX L   s                    kse                  mas
SFX L   s                    ksesse               mas
SFX L   s                    kses                 mas
SFX L   s                    ksest                mas
SFX L   s                    ksele                mas
SFX L   s                    ksel                 mas
SFX L   s                    kselt                mas
SFX L   s                    kseks                mas
SFX L   s                    kseni                mas
SFX L   s                    ksena                mas
SFX L   s                    kseta                mas
SFX L   s                    ksega                mas
SFX L   s                    ksed                 mas
SFX L   s                    kseid                mas
SFX L   s                    kseisse              mas
SFX L   s                    kseis                mas
SFX L   s                    kseist               mas
SFX L   s                    kseile               mas
SFX L   s                    kseil                mas
SFX L   s                    kseilt               mas
SFX L   s                    kseiks               mas
SFX L   s                    kseini               mas
SFX L   s                    kseina               mas
SFX L   s                    kseita               mas
SFX L   s                    kseiga               mas
SFX L   t                    nde                  hat
SFX L   t                    ndet                 hat
SFX L   t                    ndesse               hat
SFX L   t                    ndes                 hat
SFX L   t                    ndest                hat
SFX L   t                    ndele                hat
SFX L   t                    ndel                 hat
SFX L   t                    ndelt                hat
SFX L   t                    ndeks                hat
SFX L   t                    ndeni                hat
SFX L   t                    ndena                hat
SFX L   t                    ndeta                hat
SFX L   t                    ndega                hat
SFX L   t                    ndete                hat
SFX L   t                    ndeid                hat
SFX L   t                    ndetesse             hat
SFX L   t                    ndetes               hat
SFX L   t                    ndetest              hat
SFX L   t                    ndetele              hat
SFX L   t                    ndetel               hat
SFX L   t                    ndetelt              hat
SFX L   t                    ndeteks              hat
SFX L   t                    ndeteni              hat
SFX L   t                    ndetena              hat
SFX L   t                    ndeteta              hat
SFX L   t                    ndetega              hat
SFX L   t                    ndeisse              hat
SFX L   t                    ndeis                hat
SFX L   t                    ndeist               hat
SFX L   t                    ndeile               hat
SFX L   t                    ndeil                hat
SFX L   t                    ndeilt               hat
SFX L   t                    ndeiks               hat
SFX L   t                    ndeini               hat
SFX L   t                    ndeina               hat
SFX L   t                    ndeita               hat
SFX L   t                    ndeiga               hat
SFX L   0                    e                    uks
SFX L   0                    esse                 uks
SFX L   0                    es                   uks
SFX L   0                    est                  uks
SFX L   0                    ele                  uks
SFX L   0                    el                   uks
SFX L   0                    elt                  uks
SFX L   0                    eks                  uks
SFX L   0                    eni                  uks
SFX L   0                    ena                  uks
SFX L   0                    eta                  uks
SFX L   0                    ega                  uks
SFX L   0                    i                    uks
SFX L   0                    isse                 uks
SFX L   0                    is                   uks
SFX L   0                    ist                  uks
SFX L   0                    ile                  uks
SFX L   0                    il                   uks
SFX L   0                    ilt                  uks
SFX L   0                    iks                  uks
SFX L   0                    ini                  uks
SFX L   0                    ina                  uks
SFX L   0                    ita                  uks
SFX L   0                    iga                  uks
SFX L   0                    ed                   uks
SFX L   ks                   st                   uks
SFX L   ks                   ste                  uks
SFX L   ks                   stesse               uks
SFX L   ks                   stes                 uks
SFX L   ks                   stest                uks
SFX L   ks                   stele                uks
SFX L   ks                   stel                 uks
SFX L   ks                   stelt                uks
SFX L   ks                   steks                uks
SFX L   ks                   steni                uks
SFX L   ks                   stena                uks
SFX L   ks                   steta                uks
SFX L   ks                   stega                uks
SFX L   0                    t                    nas
SFX L   0                    te                   nas
SFX L   0                    tesse                nas
SFX L   0                    tes                  nas
SFX L   0                    test                 nas
SFX L   0                    tele                 nas
SFX L   0                    tel                  nas
SFX L   0                    telt                 nas
SFX L   0                    teks                 nas
SFX L   0                    teni                 nas
SFX L   0                    tena                 nas
SFX L   0                    teta                 nas
SFX L   0                    tega                 nas
SFX L   s                    kse                  nas
SFX L   s                    ksesse               nas
SFX L   s                    kses                 nas
SFX L   s                    ksest                nas
SFX L   s                    ksele                nas
SFX L   s                    ksel                 nas
SFX L   s                    kselt                nas
SFX L   s                    kseks                nas
SFX L   s                    kseni                nas
SFX L   s                    ksena                nas
SFX L   s                    kseta                nas
SFX L   s                    ksega                nas
SFX L   s                    kseid                nas
SFX L   s                    kseisse              nas
SFX L   s                    kseis                nas
SFX L   s                    kseist               nas
SFX L   s                    kseile               nas
SFX L   s                    kseil                nas
SFX L   s                    kseilt               nas
SFX L   s                    kseiks               nas
SFX L   s                    kseini               nas
SFX L   s                    kseina               nas
SFX L   s                    kseita               nas
SFX L   s                    kseiga               nas
SFX L   s                    ksed                 nas
SFX L   0                    i                    oos
SFX L   os                   e                    oos
SFX L   s                    t                    oos
SFX L   0                    t                    ões
SFX L   0                    te                   ões
SFX L   0                    tesse                ões
SFX L   0                    tes                  ões
SFX L   0                    test                 ões
SFX L   0                    tele                 ões
SFX L   0                    tel                  ões
SFX L   0                    telt                 ões
SFX L   0                    teks                 ões
SFX L   0                    teni                 ões
SFX L   0                    tena                 ões
SFX L   0                    teta                 ões
SFX L   0                    tega                 ões
SFX L   s                    kse                  ões
SFX L   s                    ksesse               ões
SFX L   s                    kses                 ões
SFX L   s                    ksest                ões
SFX L   s                    ksele                ões
SFX L   s                    ksel                 ões
SFX L   s                    kselt                ões
SFX L   s                    kseks                ões
SFX L   s                    kseni                ões
SFX L   s                    ksena                ões
SFX L   s                    kseta                ões
SFX L   s                    ksega                ões
SFX L   s                    kseid                ões
SFX L   s                    kseisse              ões
SFX L   s                    kseis                ões
SFX L   s                    kseist               ões
SFX L   s                    kseile               ões
SFX L   s                    kseil                ões
SFX L   s                    kseilt               ões
SFX L   s                    kseiks               ões
SFX L   s                    kseini               ões
SFX L   s                    kseina               ões
SFX L   s                    kseita               ões
SFX L   s                    kseiga               ões
SFX L   s                    ksed                 ões
SFX L   ks                   ht                   üks
SFX L   ks                   hte                  üks
SFX L   ks                   htde                 üks
SFX L   ks                   htsid                üks
SFX L   ks                   htdesse              üks
SFX L   ks                   htdes                üks
